Washington statutes.
RCW 36.77.070

Publication of information on county forces projects—Penalty—Prosecution.

If the board determines that any construction should be performed by county forces, and the estimated cost of the work exceeds ten thousand dollars, it shall cause to be published in one issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the county, a brief description of the work to be done and the county road engineer's estimate of the cost thereof. At the completion of such construction, the board shall cause to be published in one issue of such a newspaper a similar brief description of the work together with an accurate statement of the true and complete cost of performing such construction by county forces.

Failure to make the required publication shall subject each county commissioner to a fine of one hundred dollars for which he or she shall be liable individually and upon his or her official bond and the prosecuting attorney shall prosecute for violation of the provisions of this section and RCW 36.77.065.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4126; 2009 c 29 s 2; 1983 c 3 s 81; 1963 c 4 s 36.77.070. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 9, part; 1943 c 82 s 4, part; 1937 c 187 s 34, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-34, part.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2009 c 29 s 2 and by 2009 c 549 s 4126, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).